California, session 20252026, AB658.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 9250.20 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:9250.20. (a) In any year that an increase in the registration fee described in Section 9250 is enacted, the department shall complete and post an affordability impact analysis on its internet website within six months of the date that the increase becomes effective.(b) The affordability impact analysis shall include all of the following:(1) The average increase in annual vehicle registration costs over the past five years, including a breakdown by vehicle value.(2) The total number of vehicles with delinquent registrations and the number of registrations that became delinquent in each of the past five years, including a breakdown by vehicle value and registered address ZIP Code.(3) The total amount of delinquent registration debt owed to the department, and the amount of delinquent registration debt added in each of the past five years, including a breakdown by all of the following:(A) Vehicle value.(B) The period of time that the debt is past due.(C) The amount of debt attributable to the original balance and the amount attributable to late penalties.(4) The number of vehicles impounded and sold to collect unpaid registration debt in each of the past five years pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 9800) of this chapter and the total amount of debt collected, including a breakdown by vehicle value and registered address ZIP Code.(5) The total number of delinquent registrations and amount of delinquent registration debt referred to the Franchise Tax Board (FTB) for collection through bank levies and wage garnishment pursuant to Section 10878 of the Revenue and Taxation Code over the past five years, including a breakdown by vehicle value and registered address ZIP Code.(6) The total amount of registration debt collected by FTB and remitted to the department over the past five years.(7) The number of civil actions taken by the department to collect unpaid registration debt pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 9562 over the past five years, including a breakdown by vehicle value and registered address ZIP Code.(8) The total number of vehicles subject to a registration hold for unpaid parking tickets or toll violations pursuant to Section 4760 or Section 4770, including a breakdown by vehicle value and registered address ZIP Code.(9) The number of vehicles subject to the fee exemption pursuant to Section 9105, and Sections 10783 and 10783.2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, including a breakdown by registered address ZIP Code.(10) An itemized list of cost increases over the past five years that have contributed to a shortfall in the Motor Vehicle Account (MVA).(11) A description of efforts to improve department efficiency, reduce field office visits, automate processes, and increase the number of online transactions over the past five years, and an estimate of anticipated budgetary savings resulting from these efforts.(12) Proposals to achieve additional savings that could mitigate the need for registration fee increases.(13) Any alternative analysis that provides strategies for eliminating the MVA shortfall while minimizing the cost impact on low-income and middle-class families.(c) For purposes of this section, “vehicle value” means the five value classes described in subdivision (a) of Section 11052 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.